Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 29.
Horse Racing and Pari-Mutuel Wagering.

Article 5.1.

Live Horseracing Compact.

59.1-394.1.Live Horseracing Compact; form of compact.

59.1-394.2.Compact Committee members.

59.1-394.3.Cooperation of departments, agencies and officers of the Commonwealth.

59.1-394.4.Racing Commission powers preserved.